New York, session 2025-2026, S2573.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 99-aa to read as follows: 3 § 99-aa. Prohibitions relating to utility service. 1. For the purposes 4 of this section, "utility service" shall mean natural gas, propane, fuel 5 oil, or other fossil fuels provided to a customer. 6 2. The governing board of a municipal corporation shall not adopt any 7 local law, ordinance, regulation or policy that prohibits, or has the 8 effect of prohibiting, the connection or reconnection of a utility 9 service to a customer based upon the type or source of energy to be 10 delivered to such customer. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00157-01-5